Ohio, session 136, HB687.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 3701.851 be amended and section 3701.852 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 3701.851. The department of health shall develop a model emergency action plan for the use of automated external defibrillators by public and chartered nonpublic schools, youth sports organizations, athletic facilities, as that term is defined in section 3707.50 of the Revised Code, and sports and recreation locations, as that term is defined in section 755.13 of the Revised Code. The model emergency action plan shall require the plan to be practiced at least quarterly. The department shall develop a procedure whereby persons may report violations of section 755.13 of the Revised Code by a sports and recreation location, section 3701.852 of the Revised Code by an athletic facility, or section 3707.58 of the Revised Code by a youth sports organization. Sec. 3701.852. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Athletic facility" has the same meaning as in section 3707.50 of the Revised Code. (2) "Automated external defibrillation" has the same meaning as in section 2305.235 of the Revised Code. (3) "Automated external defibrillator" has the same meaning as in section 3313.717 of the Revised Code. (B) Each athletic facility that maintains an automated external defibrillator on its premises shall do both of the following: (1) Have at least one staff member who has successfully completed an automated external defibrillation training course that meets the requirements described in section 3701.85 of the Revised Code on duty while customers are on its premises. (2) Adopt an emergency action plan for the defibrillator's use, which may be based on the model plan developed by the department of health under section 3701.851 of the Revised Code. (C) If an athletic facility does not maintain an automated external defibrillator on its premises, it shall have at least one staff member who has successfully completed a cardiopulmonary resuscitation training course on duty while customers are on its premises. Section 2. That existing section 3701.851 of the Revised Code is hereby repealed.